Nevada, session 83, AB287.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.403 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.424, a
candidate defeated at any election may demand and receive a
recount of the vote for the office for which he or she is a candidate
to determine the number of votes received for the defeated
candidate and the number of votes received for the person who won
the election if [, within] the difference between the highest number
of votes cast for a candidate for the office and the number of votes
cast for the defeated candidate who demands the recount is 5
percent or less. To demand such a recount, within 3 working days
after the canvass of the vote and the certification by the county clerk
or city clerk of the abstract of votes, the defeated candidate who
demands the recount [:] must:
-
*AB287_R1*

– 3 –
(a) [Files] File in writing a demand with the officer with whom
the defeated candidate filed his or her declaration of candidacy; and
(b) [Deposits] Deposit in advance the estimated costs of the
recount with that officer. The estimated costs of the recount must
be determined by the officer with whom the advance is deposited
based on regulations adopted by the Secretary of State defining the
term “costs.”
2. [Any voter at an election may demand and receive] Except
as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS 293.424, a
recount of the vote for an office must be conducted if, after the
canvass of the vote and the certification by the county clerk or city
clerk of the abstract of votes, the difference between the highest
number of votes cast for a candidate for the office and the next
highest number of votes cast for a candidate for the office is 0.25
percent or less. A recount of the votes for an office is not required
pursuant to this subsection if the format of the ballot allowed a
voter to select more than one candidate for the office, unless the
difference between the number of votes cast in the election for the
candidate with the lowest number of votes who won the election
and the next highest number of votes cast for a candidate for the
office is 0.25 percent or less. No candidate is required to pay the
costs of a recount that is required pursuant to this subsection.
3. Any voter at an election may demand and receive a recount
of the vote for a ballot question if [,] the difference between the
results of the ballot question being approved or disapproved is 5
percent or less. To demand such a recount, within 3 working days
after the canvass of the vote and the certification by the county clerk
or city clerk of the abstract of votes, the voter [:] who demands the
recount must:
(a) [Files] File in writing a demand with:
(1) The Secretary of State, if the demand is for a recount of a
ballot question affecting more than one county; or
(2) The county or city clerk who will conduct the recount, if
the demand is for a recount of a ballot question affecting only one
county or city; and
(b) [Deposits] Deposit in advance the estimated costs of the
recount with the person to whom the demand was made.
[3.] The estimated costs of the recount must be determined by
the person with whom the advance is deposited based on regulations
adopted by the Secretary of State defining the term “costs.”
4. A recount of the vote for a ballot question must be
conducted if, after the canvass of the vote and the certification by
the county clerk or city clerk of the abstract of votes, the difference
between the results of the ballot question being approved or
-
*AB287_R1*

– 4 –
disapproved is 0.25 percent or less. No voter is required to pay the
costs of a recount that is required pursuant to this subsection.
[4.] 5. As used in this section, “canvass” means:
(a) In any primary election, the canvass by the board of county
commissioners of the returns for a candidate or ballot question voted
for in one county or the canvass by the board of county
commissioners last completing its canvass of the returns for a
candidate or ballot question voted for in more than one county.
(b) In any primary city election, the canvass by the city council
of the returns for a candidate or ballot question voted for in the city.
(c) In any general election:
(1) The canvass by the Supreme Court of the returns for a
candidate for a statewide office or a statewide ballot question; or
(2) The canvass of the board of county commissioners of the
returns for any other candidate or ballot question, as provided in
paragraph (a).
(d) In any general city election, the canvass by the city council
of the returns for a candidate or ballot question voted for in the city.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.404 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.404 1. Where a recount is demanded or required
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.403 or demanded pursuant
to 293.424, the:
(a) County clerk of each county affected by the recount shall
employ a recount board to conduct the recount in the county, and
shall act as chair of the recount board unless the recount is for the
office of county clerk, in which case the registrar of voters of the
county, if a registrar of voters has been appointed for the county,
shall act as chair of the recount board. If a registrar of voters has not
been appointed for the county, the chair of the board of county
commissioners, if the chair is not a candidate on the ballot, shall act
as chair of the recount board. If the recount is for the office of
county clerk, a registrar of voters has not been appointed for the
county and the chair of the board of county commissioners is a
candidate on the ballot, the chair of the board of county
commissioners shall appoint another member of the board of county
commissioners who is not a candidate on the ballot to act as chair of
the recount board. A member of the board of county commissioners
who is a candidate on the ballot may not serve as a member of the
recount board.
(b) City clerk shall employ a recount board to conduct the
recount in the city, and shall act as chair of the recount board unless
the recount is for the office of city clerk, in which case the mayor of
the city, if the mayor is not a candidate on the ballot, shall act as
chair of the recount board. If the recount is for the office of city
clerk and the mayor of the city is a candidate on the ballot, the
-
*AB287_R1*

– 5 –
mayor of the city shall appoint another member of the city council
who is not a candidate on the ballot to act as chair of the recount
board. A member of the city council who is a candidate on the ballot
may not serve as a member of the recount board.
2. Each candidate for the office affected by the recount and the
voter who demanded the recount, if any, may be present in person or
by an authorized representative, but may not be a member of the
recount board.
3. The recount must include a count and inspection of all
ballots, including rejected ballots, and must determine whether all
ballots are marked as required by law. All ballots must be recounted
in the same manner in which the ballots were originally tabulated.
4. The county or city clerk shall unseal and give to the recount
board all ballots to be counted.
5. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 3. NRS 293.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.405 1. If the person who demanded [the] a recount
pursuant to subsection 1 or 3 of NRS 293.403 or subsection 1 of
NRS 293.424 does not prevail, and it is found that the sum
deposited was less than the cost of the recount, the person shall,
upon demand, pay the deficiency to the county clerk, city clerk or
Secretary of State, as the case may be. If the sum deposited is in
excess of the cost, the excess must be refunded to the person.
2. If the person who demanded the recount prevails, the sum
deposited with the Secretary of State, county clerk or city clerk must
be refunded to the person and the cost of the recount must be paid as
follows:
(a) If the recount concerns an office or ballot question for which
voting is not statewide, the cost must be borne by the county or city
which conducted the recount.
(b) If the recount concerns an office or ballot question for which
voting is statewide, the clerk of each county shall submit a statement
of its costs in the recount to the Secretary of State for review and
approval. The Secretary of State shall submit the statements to the
State Board of Examiners, which shall repay the allowable costs
from the Reserve for Statutory Contingency Account to the
respective counties.
3. If a recount of the vote for an office or ballot question for
which voting is statewide is required pursuant to subsection 2 or
subsection 4 of NRS 293.403, the clerk of each county shall
submit a statement of its costs in the recount to the Secretary of
State for review and approval. The Secretary of State shall submit
the statements to the State Board of Examiners, which shall repay
-
*AB287_R1*

– 6 –
the allowable costs from the Reserve for Statutory Contingency
Account to the respective counties.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.424, each recount
must be commenced within 5 days after [demand,] the recount is
demanded or required pursuant to NRS 293.403 and must be
completed within 5 days after it is begun.
[4.] 5. After the recount of a precinct is completed, that
precinct must not be subject to another recount for the same office
or ballot question at the same election.
Sec. 4. NRS 293.413 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.413 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.424,
the statement of contest provided for in NRS 293.407 shall be filed
with the clerk of the district court no later than 5 days after a recount
is completed, and no later than 14 days after the election if no
recount is demanded [.] or required. The parties to a contest shall be
denominated contestant and defendant.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.424, the court
shall set the matter for hearing not less than 5 days nor more than 10
days after the filing of the statement of contest. Election contests
shall take precedence over all regular business of the court in order
that results of elections shall be determined as soon as practicable.
3. The court may refer the contest to a special master in the
manner provided by the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure, and such
special master shall have all powers necessary for a proper
determination of the contest.
Sec. 5. NRS 293B.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.400 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a
recount is demanded or required pursuant to the provisions of NRS
293.403 or demanded pursuant to NRS 293.424 or if an election is
contested pursuant to NRS 293.407 or 293.424, the county or city
clerk shall ensure that each mechanical recording device which
directly recorded votes electronically for the applicable election
provides a record printed on paper of each ballot voted on that
device.
2. In carrying out the requirements of this section, the county
or city clerk shall:
(a) Print only the records required for the recount or contest; and
(b) Collect those records and deposit them in the vaults of the
county or city clerk pursuant to NRS 293.391 or 293C.390.
Sec. 6. Chapter 225 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 7 and 8 of this act.
Sec. 7. 1. The Secretary of State shall establish and
administer the Voter Access Grant Program to provide grants of
money from the Account for the Voter Access Grant Program
-
*AB287_R1*

– 7 –
created by section 8 of this act to eligible entities to support the
administration of elections and improve voter access.
2. In carrying out the Program, the Secretary of State may
award a grant to an eligible entity for:
(a) The purchase and maintenance of supplies or equipment
for an election;
(b) Payment of election board officers and other employees
who perform duties relating to elections;
(c) Programs for voter education and outreach; and
(d) Any other project, program or expense that the Secretary of
State determines to be eligible for the Program.
3. The Secretary of State, or his or her designee, shall review
each application submitted for a grant from the Program in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 6.
When reviewing an application, the Secretary of State, or his or
her designee, may request any additional information from an
applicant to determine eligibility of the applicant for a grant.
4. Any grant awarded to an eligible entity pursuant to the
Program is in addition to and does not supplant or replace any
money, support or services otherwise authorized or required by
law to be provided to an eligible entity.
5. On or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Secretary of State shall prepare and submit a written report to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the Legislature. The report must include, without limitation, for
the immediately preceding biennium:
(a) The number of eligible entities that applied for a grant
from the Program;
(b) The number of eligible entities that received a grant from
the Program;
(c) The number of eligible entities that applied for but did not
receive a grant from the Program;
(d) The total amount of grants awarded from the Program;
and
(e) A description of the projects, programs, supplies or
equipment that were purchased or supported, in whole or in part,
from the Program.
6. The Secretary of State shall adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including,
without limitation, regulations that prescribe:
(a) The process for applying for a grant from the Program,
including, without limitation, application requirements;
(b) Criteria for eligibility for a grant from the Program;
(c) The order of priority for reviewing applications and
awarding grants from the Program; and
-
*AB287_R1*

– 8 –
(d) Standards for determining whether to approve an
application for a grant from the Program.
7. For the purposes of this section, “eligible entity” means a
county, city or tribal government.
Sec. 8. 1. The Account for the Voter Access Grant Program
is hereby created in the State General Fund. The Secretary of
State shall administer the Account.
2. The Secretary of State may apply for and accept any
donation, gift, grant, bequest or other source of money for deposit
in the Account.
3. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the Account.
4. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 9. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 10. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
H
-
*AB287_R1*